Wyoming statutes. Title 39 Taxation and Revenue
Article 1. State Sales Tax
§ 39-15-102.
Administration; confidentiality.

This article is known and may be cited as the “Selective Sales Tax Act of 1937”.

The administration of this article is vested in the department of revenue.

The department may provide for the issuance, affixing and payment of revenue stamps or the issuance of tokens or other devices to more efficiently secure the payment, collection and accounting for taxes imposed by this article.

Notices required to be mailed by the department under this article if mailed to the address shown on the records of the department shall be sufficient for the purposes of this article.

No state employee or other person who by virtue of his employment has knowledge of the business affairs of any person filing or required to file any tax returns under this article shall make known their contents in any manner or permit any person to have access to any returns or information contained therein except as provided by law. The department may also allow the following:

The delivery to the taxpayer or his legal representatives upon written request of a copy of any return or report in connection with his tax;

The publication of statistics so classified to prevent the identification of particular returns or reports;

The inspection by the attorney general of the state of the report or return of any person who brings an action against the state, or against whom an action is contemplated or has been instituted;

The introduction into evidence of any report or return or information therefrom in any administrative or court proceeding to which the person making the report or return is a party;

The furnishing of any information to the United States government and its territories, the District of Columbia, any state allowing similar privileges to the department or to the multistate tax commission for relay to tax officials of cooperating states. Information furnished shall be only for tax purposes;

The inspection of tax returns and records by the state department of audit;

The sharing of information with local government entities and other state agencies, provided a written request is made to the department and the governmental entity or agency demonstrates sufficient reason to obtain the information for official business purposes.

No person shall fail or refuse to make any return or payment required by this article or shall make any false return or statement or shall evade the payment of any tax due. No person shall aid or abet another in any attempt to evade payment of the tax due. No person shall knowingly attest by signature to a false or fraudulent return. The district court of the county in which violations of this subsection occur shall have jurisdiction.

History.

Laws 1998, ch. 5, § 1.

Law reviews. —

For article, “A Separate Sales Tax Upon Vendors,” see 1 Wyo. L.J. 89.

§ 39-15-103.
Imposition.

Taxable event. The following shall apply:

Except as provided by W.S.

39-15-105

, there is levied an excise tax upon:

The sales price of every retail sale of tangible personal property within the state;

The gross rental paid for the lease or contract transferring possession of tangible personal property if the transfer of possession would be taxable if a sale occurred;

The sales price paid for intrastate telecommunications services including the consideration paid for the sale, rental or leasing of any equipment or ancillary services incidental thereto, and the sales price paid for intrastate calls which originate and terminate in a single state and are billed to a customer with a place of primary use in this state from mobile telecommunications services as provided by the Mobile Telecommunications Sourcing Act, 4 U.S.C. §§ 116 through 126. The definitions and provisions of the Mobile Telecommunications Sourcing Act shall apply to this article;

The sales price paid to carriers for intrastate transportation of passengers;

The sales price paid to public utilities as defined in W.S.

37-1-101

through

37-3-114

and to persons furnishing gas, electricity or heat for domestic, industrial or commercial consumption;

The sales price paid for meals and cover charges, excluding all gratuities regardless of whether offered by the customer or invoiced by the seller, at any place where meals are regularly served to the public;

The sales price paid for living quarters in hotels, motels, tourist courts and similar establishments providing lodging service for transient guests;

The sales price paid for each admission to any place of amusement, entertainment, recreation, games or athletic event. If any persons other than employees, officers of the law on official business or children under twelve (12) years of age are admitted free or at reduced rates to any such place when an admission charge is made to other persons, an equivalent tax shall be paid by these persons based on the price charged to other persons;

The sales price paid for services performed for the repair, alteration or improvement of tangible personal property;

The sales price paid for all services and tangible personal property used in rendering services to real or tangible personal property within an oil or gas well site beginning with and including the setting and cementing of production casing, or if production casing is not set as in the case of an open hole completion, after the completion of the underreaming or the attainment of total depth of the oil or gas well and continuing with all activities sequentially required for the production of any oil or gas well regardless of the chronological occurrence of the activity. All services required during the entire productive life of the well, including recompletion, all the way through abandonment shall be subject to this subparagraph. The provisions of W.S.

39-15-301

through

39-15-311

and W.S.

39-16-301

through

39-16-311

shall not apply to this subparagraph;

The sales price paid for motor vehicles, house trailers, trailer coaches, trailers or semitrailers as defined by W.S.

31-1-101

;

The sales price paid for alcoholic beverages;

The sales price paid for computer hardware including the basic set of operating instructions called system software which is necessary to the basic operation of the computer hardware and the sales price paid for the hardware media used to transfer computer software programs;

Except as otherwise provided in this subparagraph, the sales price of every retail sale of specified digital products within the state. A sale of specified digital products is only subject to the tax under this section if the purchaser has permanent use of the specified digital product. A vendor who purchases specified digital products for further commercial broadcast, rebroadcast, transmission, retransmission, licensing, relicensing, distribution, redistribution or exhibition in whole or in part to another person shall be considered a wholesaler and not subject to the tax imposed by this article. Those services provided by a trade association as part of a member benefit are not subject to the tax imposed by this subparagraph.

Basis of tax. The following shall apply:

Except as provided by W.S.

39-15-105

, there is levied and shall be paid by the purchaser on all sales an excise tax upon all events as provided by subsection (a) of this section;

For purposes of W.S. 39-15-107(b)(i), the sales price of motor vehicles, house trailers, trailer coaches, trailers or semitrailers shall be declared by the purchaser upon a copy of the original invoice from the vendor or upon an affidavit furnished by the department if not purchased from a vendor and the tax collected shall be based upon the declaration or invoice;

Except for those vehicles specified under W.S. 39-15-107(b)(viii), the tax imposed by this article upon the sale of a motor vehicle, house trailer, trailer coach, trailer or semitrailer purchased as a gift shall be collected from the donee prior to the first registration based upon the fair market value of the gift at the time of the gift;

The tax imposed by this article upon the sale of a transportable home shall be collected upon the first sale of the transportable home. The tax shall be collected on seventy percent (70%) of the sales price of the transportable home. No tax shall be collected upon any subsequent sale of the home.

Taxpayer. The following shall apply:

Except as otherwise provided every vendor shall collect the tax imposed by this article and is liable for the entire amount of taxes imposed;

Every person purchasing goods or services taxed by this article is liable for the taxes and shall pay any tax owed to the department unless the taxes have been paid to a vendor;

Any tax due under this article constitutes a debt to the state from the persons who are parties to the transaction, other than any vendor or other seller who is prohibited or not authorized by law to collect any tax under this article, and is a lien from the date the tax is due on all the real and personal property of those persons;

The vendor shall file a return within thirty (30) days after discontinuing or selling his business. His successor in business shall withhold from the purchase price enough money to pay the taxes, penalties and interest due on the outstanding amount of all credit, installment and conditional sales upon which the tax has not been paid until the time the former owner produces a receipt from the department showing that all taxes have been paid or a certificate that no taxes are due. If the successor fails to withhold from the purchase price the amount due and the taxes, penalty and interest are unpaid the original vendor and successor vendor are liable for the payment of the unpaid taxes, penalties and interest.

History.

Laws 1998, ch. 5, § 1; 1999, ch. 132, § 1; 2002 Sp. Sess., ch. 37, § 1; ch. 46, § 1; 2007, ch. 10, § 1; 2010, ch. 64, § 1; 2011, ch. 4, § 1; 2013 ch. 60, § 1, effective July 1, 2013.

The 2007 amendment,

effective January 1, 2008,
in (a)(i)(C), substituted “telecommunications” for “telephone and telegraph,” inserted “sale” and “ancillary” in the first sentence, and made a related change.

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, added (a)(i)(P).

The 2011 amendment,

in (a)(i)(K), substituted “and tangible personal property used in rendering services” for “rendered,” and added the last sentence.

Laws 2011, ch. 4 § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved February 15, 2011.

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, added “, excluding all gratuities regardless of whether offered by the customer or invoiced by the seller, following “cover charges” in (a)(i)(F).

Editor's notes. —

There is no paragraph (a)(ii) or subparagraph (a)(i)(I) or (a)(i)(L) in this section as it appears on the printed act.

Rental of campsights.—

Department of Revenue had the burden of proving that a county fair board’s rental of campsites at the county fairgrounds was a taxable event, and there was a reasonable basis for the Board of Equalization’s determination that the Department failed to meet its burden. The Supreme Court could not find the Board committed error by finding the Department failed to meet its burden. State Dep?t of State Dep't of Revenue v. Bd. of County Comm'rs, 2019 WY 7, 432 P.3d 920,

2019 Wyo. LEXIS 6

(Wyo. 2019).

Mobile homes.—

Buyer did not breach a contract to sell a mobile home because the buyer’s obligation to pay sales tax was contingent on tax being due, but tax was not due since only the seller’s first ownership of the home was taxed. Larson v. Burton Constr., Inc., 2018 WY 74, 421 P.3d 538,

2018 Wyo. LEXIS 80

(Wyo. 2018).

Hotel room markup taxable. —

Online travel companies' (OTCs') markup on hotel room prices was not deductible from the taxable sales price as transient guests could not obtain a hotel room through an OTC without paying the markup, and thus, the customer paid for a room. Travelocity.com, LP v. Wyo. Dep't of Revenue, 2014 WY 43, 329 P.3d 131,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 45

(Wyo. 2014).

Since the online travel companies sold the right to occupy rooms in Wyoming, that service was delivered in Wyoming, and thus, was taxable in the state under the sourcing rule. Travelocity.com, LP v. Wyo. Dep't of Revenue, 2014 WY 43, 329 P.3d 131,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 45

(Wyo. 2014).

Constitutionality. —

Sales tax applied to online travel companies' (OTCs') markup to hotel rooms sold online did not violate the Dormant Commerce Clause where consumers could visit visitor bureaus' websites to book rooms through the OTCs, the statute only taxed the sales price of hotels rooms located in the state, there was no evidence that Wyoming entities utilized the merchant model, and the tax made police, fire, roads, and other services available to guests. Travelocity.com, LP v. Wyo. Dep't of Revenue, 2014 WY 43, 329 P.3d 131,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 45

(Wyo. 2014).

Sales tax applied to online travel companies' (OTCs') markup to hotel rooms sold online did not violate the Equal Protection Clause where there was no evidence that any Wyoming entities were using the merchant model, and thus, there was no evidence that Wyoming businesses operating in the same manner as the OTCs were treated differently. Travelocity.com, LP v. Wyo. Dep't of Revenue, 2014 WY 43, 329 P.3d 131,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 45

(Wyo. 2014).

Sales tax applied to online travel companies' (OTCs') markup to hotel rooms sold online did not violate the Substantive Due Process Clause where the language in the tax statutes was sufficiently clear to be understood without resorting to rules of statutory construction. Travelocity.com, LP v. Wyo. Dep't of Revenue, 2014 WY 43, 329 P.3d 131,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 45

(Wyo. 2014).

Railroad construction ballast not taxable. —

Sales tax did not need to be paid by railroad company on purchases of “construction” ballast, since the purchases constituted destination sales, and a taxable event occurs only when title or possession of tangible personal property passes to the purchaser in State ex rel. State Department of Revenue v. Union Pac. R.R. Co., 2003 WY 54, 67 P.3d 1176,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 67

(Wyo. 2003).

Possession. —

Taxpayer's sales were subject to Wyoming sales tax because the buyers took possession in Wyoming, Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 39-15-103(a)(i)(A), and title passed to the buyer when the vehicle was delivered to the buyer or an agent, Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 34.1-2-401.
Maverick Motorsports Group, LLC v. Dep't of Revenue, 2011 WY 76, 253 P.3d 125,

2011 Wyo. LEXIS 78

(Wyo. 2011).

End user common line charge. —

End user common line charge did not constitute a charge for intrastate telephone service that was subject to Wyoming sales and use taxes under this section because there was a clear legislative intent to exclude interstate telephone services from Wyoming taxation. Qwest Corp. v. State, 2006 WY 35, 130 P.3d 507,

2006 Wyo. LEXIS 39

(Wyo. 2006).

Interest and penalties. —

Department of revenue was not authorized to assess interest and penalties against purchasers for delinquent sales taxes. State v. Bannon Energy Corp., 999 P.2d 1306,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 59

(Wyo. 2000).

Concrete blocks sold by Utah company taxable. —

Sales tax exemption did not apply to a Utah company; there was no violation of the Commerce Clause since the taxpayer's connection to Wyoming was substantially more than the shipping of goods by a non-resident seller, and the taxpayer had a tax license and collected taxes on similar transactions. Moreover, the shipments to customers in Wyoming constituted taxable destination sales where the evidence showed a delivery address in Wyoming, inspection took place at the destination point, Utah taxes were not collected, and Wyoming taxes had been collected in similar cases.
Buehner Block Co. v. Wyo. Dep't of Revenue, 2006 WY 90, 139 P.3d 1150,

2006 Wyo. LEXIS 99

(Wyo. 2006).